North Dakota, session 69, SB2129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 43-29-01.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
43-29-01.1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. "Accepted livestock management practice" means a procedure that is commonly performed as
part of the routine management of livestock which includes vaccination, implantation of growth
hormones, branding, castration, dehorning, docking, earmarking, semen collection,
nonsurgical artificial insemination, and assisting in a nonsurgical birthing process.
2. "Animal" means a member of the animal kingdom other than a human being whether living or
dead.
3. "AccreditedApproved college of veterinary medicine" means anya veterinary college or
division of a university or college which offers the degree of doctor of veterinary medicine or its
equivalent and which conforms to the standards required for accreditation by the council on
education of the American veterinary medical associationan accrediting entity approved by the
board, if the entity is nationally recognized and develops and maintains accreditation
standards for veterinary education.
2.4. "AccreditedApproved program in veterinary technology" means any postsecondary
educational program of two or more academic years that is accredited by the committee on
veterinary technician education and activities of the American veterinary medical
associationthat offers a degree in veterinary technology or its equivalent and has been
approved by the board by rule.
3. "Animal" means any animal other than a human being. The term includes any mammal, bird,
fish, reptile, or fowl, whether wild or domestic, living or dead.
4.5. "Board" means the board of veterinary medical examiners.
5.6. "Certificate" means a certificate issued by the educational commission for foreign veterinary
graduates or the educational equivalence program of the American association of veterinary
state boards, indicating the holder has demonstrated knowledge and skill equivalent to that
possessed by a graduate of an accredited college of veterinary medicine.

S. B. NO. 2129 - PAGE 2
6. "Licensed veterinarian" means a person who is licensed by the board to practice veterinary
medicine.
7. "Licensed veterinary technician" means a person who has graduated from an accredited
program in veterinary technology or an equivalent program as determined by the board, and
who has passed an examination prescribed by the board.
8. "Client" means the patient's owner, owner's agent, or other individual presenting the patient for
care.
7. "Complementary, integrative, and alternative therapies" means a heterogeneous group of
preventative, diagnostic, and therapeutic philosophies and practices not considered part of
conventional veterinary medicine practiced by most veterinarians.
8. "Consent" means the veterinarian has informed the client of the diagnostic and treatment
options, risk assessment, and prognosis, and the client has authorized the recommended
services.
9. "Consultation" means advice or assistance received by a veterinarian in person, or by any
method of communication, from a veterinarian or other individual whose expertise, in the
opinion of the veterinarian, would benefit a patient.
10. "Direct supervision" means supervision by a veterinarian who is readily available on the
premises where the patient is being treated and has assumed responsibility for the veterinary
care given to the patient by an individual working under the direction of the veterinarian.
11. "Foreign practitioner" has the same meaning as defined under section 43 - 51 - 01 .
12. "Immediate supervision" means supervision by a veterinarian who is in the immediate area
and within audible and visual range of the patient and the individual treating the patient and
has assumed responsibility for the veterinary care given to the patient by an individual working
under the direction of the veterinarian.
13. "Impaired veterinarian" means a veterinarian who is unable to practice veterinary medicine
with reasonable skill and safety because of a physical or mental disability or the use of
alcohol, drugs, or other habit-forming chemicals.
14. "Impaired veterinary technician" means a veterinary technician who is unable to practice
veterinary technology with reasonable skill and safety because of a physical or mental
disability or the use of alcohol, drugs, or other habit-forming chemicals.
15. "Indirect supervision" means the supervision by a veterinarian who is not on the premises
where the patient is being treated but has given written or oral instructions for the treatment of
the patient, is readily available for communication, and has assumed responsibility for the
veterinary care given to the patient by an individual working under the direction of the
veterinarian.
16. "Jurisdiction" means any commonwealth, state, or territory of the United States of America,
including the District of Columbia, or any province of Canada.
17. "Patient" means an animal or group of animals examined or treated by a veterinarian.
18. "Practice of veterinary medicine" means tothe:
a. Diagnose, treat, correct, change, relieve, or prevent animalDiagnosis, prognosis,
correction, supervision, recommendation, or performance of any medical or surgical
treatment, including complementary, integrative or alternative therapies, for the
diagnosis, prevention, cure, or relief of a wound, disease, deformity, defect, fracture,
bodily injury, or otherdental, physical, behavioral, or mental conditions. The term includes

S. B. NO. 2129 - PAGE 3
the prescription or administration of any drug, medicine, biologic, apparatus, application,
anesthetic, or other therapeutic or diagnostic substance or technique, the use of any
manual or mechanical procedure for testing for pregnancy, or for correcting sterility or
infertility, or to render advice or recommendation with regard to any of the
above.condition of an animal;
b. RepresentPrescription, distribution, or administration of a drug, medicine, anesthetic,
biologic, appliance, apparatus, application, or treatment to an animal;
c. Provision of any manual or mechanical procedure for the diagnosis or treatment of
pregnancy, sterility, or infertility of an animal;
d. Determination of the health, fitness, or soundness of an animal;
e. Representation of oneself, directly or indirectly, publicly or privately, an ability and
willingness to do an act described in subdivision a.as engaging in the practice of
veterinary medicine; or
c.f. Use of any title, word, abbreviation, or letter in a manner or under circumstances that
induce the belief the personthat the individual using thesuch title, word, abbreviation, or
letter is qualified to do any act described in subdivision a authorized to practice veterinary
medicine under this chapter.
d. Apply principles of environmental sanitation, food inspection, environmental pollution
control, animal nutrition, zoonotic disease control, and disaster medicine in the promotion
and protection of public health.
19. a. "Practice of veterinary technology" means the:
(1) Provision of professional medical care, monitoring, or treatment on the basis of
written or oral instructions from a veterinarian;
(2) Representation of oneself, directly or indirectly, as engaging in the practice of
veterinary technology; or
(3) Use of any title, word, abbreviation, or letter in a manner or under circumstances
inducing the belief the individual using such title is authorized to practice veterinary
technology under this chapter.
b. This section may not be construed to permit a veterinary technician to do the following:
(1) Surgery, except when acting as a surgical assistant to a veterinarian;
(2) Diagnose;
(3) Prognose; or
(4) Prescribe.
20. "State board examination" means the jurisprudence examination administered by the board.
21. "Supervising veterinarian" means a veterinarian who has a valid veterinarian-client-patient
relationship and assumes responsibility for the veterinary care provided to the patient by an
individual working under the direction of the veterinarian.
22. "Teleadvice" means the provision of any health information, opinion, or guidance that is not
specific to a particular animal's health, illness, or injury and is not intended to diagnose,
prognose, or treat an animal.

S. B. NO. 2129 - PAGE 4
23. "Telehealth" means the use of technology to gather and deliver health information, advice,
education, or patient care remotely.
24. "Teletriage" means electronic communication with the client to determine urgency and need
for immediate referral to a veterinarian.
25. "Veterinarian" means an individual who is licensed to practice veterinary medicine under this
chapter.
9.26. "Veterinarian-client-patient relationship" means:
a. A a relationship in which the veterinarian has assumed the responsibility for making
medical judgments regarding the health of an animal and the need for medical treatment,
a patient and the client, who is the owner or other caretaker, has agreed to follow the
instructions of the veterinarian.
b. There is sufficient knowledge of the animal by the veterinarian to initiate at least a
general or preliminary diagnosis of the medical condition of the animal.
c. The practicing veterinarian is readily available for followup in the case of adverse
reactions or failure of the regimen of therapy. This relationship exists only when the
veterinarian has recently seen and is personally acquainted with the keeping and care of
the animal by virtue of an examination of the animal and by medically appropriate and
timely visits to the premises where the animal is kept.
10.27. "Veterinary medicine" includes veterinary surgery, obstetrics, dentistry, chiropractic,
acupuncture, and all other branches or specialties of veterinary medicine.
28. "Veterinary premises" means any premises or facility where the practice of veterinary
medicine is performed but may not include the premises of a client, research facility, military
base, or an approved college of veterinary medicine.
29. "Veterinary technician" means an individual who is licensed to practice veterinary technology
under this chapter.
30. "Veterinary technology" includes all branches or specialties of veterinary technology.
31. "Veterinary telemedicine" means the virtual practice of veterinary medicine over the
telecommunications infrastructure.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 43-29 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Requirements of a veterinarian-client-patient relationship.
1. A veterinarian-client-patient relationship may not be established unless the veterinarian has
sufficient knowledge of the patient to initiate a general or preliminary diagnosis of the medical
condition of the patient. To establish a veterinarian-client-patient relationship, the veterinarian
must be personally acquainted with the keeping and care of the patient by virtue of a medically
appropriate and timely in-person examination of the patient by the veterinarian, or by a timely
in-person visit to the premises where the patient is managed or resides.
2. The veterinarian must be reasonably available for patient followup care after a veterinarian-
client-patient relationship is established.
3. The veterinarian shall provide oversight of patient treatment.
4. Patient records must be maintained according to rules promulgated by the board.

S. B. NO. 2129 - PAGE 5
5. A veterinarian-client-patient relationship may not be established solely through veterinary
telemedicine.
6. A veterinarian seeking consultation shall maintain the veterinarian-client-patient relationship.
7. A veterinarian may terminate a veterinarian-client-patient relationship by notifying the client
that the veterinarian no longer wishes to serve the patient and client.
8. The veterinarian shall provide medical records to the client, another veterinarian, or a foreign
practitioner designated by the client if the veterinarian-client-patient relationship has been
terminated. The veterinarian shall allow the client a reasonable amount of time to arrange care
with another veterinarian unless the circumstance, patient, or client threatens the safety of the
veterinarian or the staff.
9. A veterinarian who in good faith engages in the practice of veterinary medicine by rendering or
attempting to render emergency care may not be subject to penalty based solely on the
inability to establish a veterinarian-client-patient relationship.
10. The veterinarian-client-patient relationship may extend to all veterinarians within the same
practice with access to the patient records.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 43-29-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
1. The state board of veterinary medical examiners consists of five gubernatorially appointed
members. In appointing the board members, the governor shall appoint three veterinarians,
one veterinarianveterinary technician, and one individual representing the public. In appointing
the veterinarian members of the board, the governor shall make an effort to appoint:
a. One veterinarian whose practice has a predominant focus on large animals;
b. One veterinarian whose practice has a predominant focus on small animals; and
c. One veterinarian whose practice focuses on both large and small animals.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 43-29-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
43-29-03. Officers of board - Seal - Meetings - Limitations on meetings - ExaminationsDuties
of board - Rules - Code of ethics - Inspection of facilities - Educational requirements -
ReciprocityFees.
1. The board shall elect a president and a secretary. The board shall have a seal, and the
president and the secretary may administer oathsvice president. The board shall hold
meetings semiannually in the spring and fall of each year for the examinationapproval of
candidates at a time and place specified by the boardapplicants for licensure. The board may
hold any other meeting it determines necessary at the time and place it designates. No
session of the board may exceed two days. A quorum of the board consists of two members
and such quorum is sufficientmust be present to conduct the business and proceedings of the
board, except that any changes in the rules must be taken at a meeting at which all the
members are present.
2. The board may adopt and enforce reasonable rules, and orders that it determines to be
necessary to the performance of its duties and the regulation of the practice of veterinary
medicine; establish standards for professional conduct, inspection of facilities, and educational
requirements for renewal and granting of licenses; prescribe forms for application for
examination; prepare and supervise examination of applicants for license to practice
veterinary medicine; obtain the services of professional examination agencies in lieu of its own
preparation of such examinations; and issue and revoke licenses as provided in this chapter.

S. B. NO. 2129 - PAGE 6
All rules must be submitted to the attorney general in accordance with chapter 28-32.,
veterinary technology, and veterinary telemedicine, including to:
a. Establish standards for professional conduct and inspection of veterinary premises;
b. Establish requirements for granting of licenses and temporary licenses;
c. Establish requirements for renewal of licenses and continuing education;
d. Prepare application forms for licensure and renewal;
e. Administer the state board examination for qualified applicants;
f. Obtain the services of professional examination agencies to administer national
examinations; and
g. Issue, suspend, revoke, or place on probationary status licenses and temporary licenses
as provided in this chapter.
3. All rules must be submitted to the attorney general in accordance with chapter 28 - 32 .
3.4. The board may, in its discretion, enter reciprocal agreements with the examining boards of
other states and nations, governing the granting of licenses to practice veterinary medicine
and surgery in this state without the applicant taking a written examination. Under no
circumstances, however, may any reciprocal agreement be entered with the board of another
state or nation unless the requirements for the granting of licenses in the other state or nation
are on an equal or higher standard to the requirements of this state. The board may prescribe
by rule any other terms or conditions to be contained in the agreements. The board shall
determine the fee for license by reciprocity agreement.shall set the following by rule:
a. Application fee;
b. License fee;
c. Temporary license fee;
d. Renewal fee;
e. Late renewal fee; and
f. Continuing education fee.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 43-29-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
43-29-04. Record of proceedings of board - Register of applicants kept by board - Records
and register as evidence.
The state board of veterinary medical examiners shall keep a record of all its proceedings and a
register of applicants for licenses showing the name of each applicant, the time spent by each applicant
in the study and practice of veterinary medicine, surgery, or dentistry or veterinary technology, and the
name and location of the school, college, or universityprogram which granted the applicant a degree or
diploma. Such books and records are prima facie evidence of the matters recorded therein.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 43-29-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2129 - PAGE 7
43-29-05. Compensation and expenses of members of board.
Members of the board may receive for each day during which theythe members are actually
engaged in the performance of the duties of their office suchthe per diem as must be fixed by the board.
They may alsoThe members also may be reimbursed for necessary travel expenses and meals and
lodging expenses at the same rate and in the same manner as are elected officials and employees of
the state.
The board may select one of its members to attend the annual meeting of the national organization
of state examining boards. The member so selected may be reimbursed for necessary travel expenses
and meals and lodging expenses at the same rate and in the same manner as are elected officials and
employees of the state.
The board may incur no expense exceeding the sum received as fees, as hereinafter provided.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Section 43-29-05.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
43-29-05.1. Executive secretarydirector.
The board may employ an executive secretarydirector and such other personsindividuals as it
deems advisablenecessary to carry out the purpose of this chapter at such salaries as it may
determine.
Each biennium the executive secretary shall prepare the budget of the board for presentation to the
executive office of the budget. The executive secretary shall also carry out all routine secretarial and
other duties as directed by the board.
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Section 43-29-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
43-29-06. Graduation from recognized school and certificate or permit from boardLicense
required.
Only a graduate of the veterinary course offered in a veterinary school, college, or university
recognized by the board, and who possesses a certificate of registrationAn individual must have a
license or temporary license issued by the board which is in effect, may engage in the to practice of
veterinary medicine or veterinary technology.
SECTION 9. AMENDMENT. Section 43-29-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
43-29-07. Application for license - Change of address - Display of certificate of
registrationRequirements for veterinarian licensure.
1. A person desiring
The board may grant a license to practice veterinary medicine in this state shall make written
application to the board. The application must show the applicant is a graduate of an accredited college
of veterinary medicine or the holder of a certificate. The application must also show the applicant is a
person of good moral character and any other information and proof the board may require. The
application must be accompanied by a fee in the amount established by the board. If the board
determines an applicant possesses the proper qualifications, the board shall admit the applicant to the
next examination. If the applicant is eligible for license without examination under section 43-29-07.2,
the board may grant the applicant a license. If an applicant is found not qualified to take the
examination or for a license without examination, the board shall immediately notify the applicant in
writing of this finding and the grounds of this finding. An applicant found unqualified may request a
hearing on the question of the applicant's qualifications.

S. B. NO. 2129 - PAGE 8
2. Each veterinarian licensed by the board, whether a resident or not, shall notify the secretary of
any change in that person's office address or employment within sixty days after the change
has taken place. Any person licensed to practice veterinary medicine after the fifteenth day of
April, or any person issued a temporary permit to practice veterinary medicine after that date,
is exempt from this requirement to pay the annual registration fee until the first day of July of
the year following licensure.
3. Registration is a condition precedent to the practice of veterinary medicine and surgery in this
state, and a certificate of registration currently in effect must be on display at all times in the
office of each veterinarian engaged in active practice.to an applicant who:
1. Is a graduate of an approved college of veterinary medicine or has completed an equivalency
program of veterinary medicine as established by the board by rule;
2. Passes the national board examination and clinical competency test, or the North American
veterinary licensing examination;
3. Passes the state board examination;
4. Has no grounds for license refusal under section 43 - 29 - 14; and
5. Meets any additional requirements for licensure established by the board by rule.
SECTION 10. AMENDMENT. Section 43-29-07.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
43-29-07.1. Veterinary technicians - ExaminationsRequirements for veterinary technician
licensure.
1. An
The board may grant a license to practice veterinary technology to an applicant for licensure as a
veterinary technician must have an examination date offered at least annually at a time, place, and date
determined by the board at least ninety days before the scheduled examination.
2. An applicant for licensure as a veterinary technician must pass the veterinary technician
national examination with a score approved by the board.
3. An applicant for licensure as a veterinary technician who has successfully passed the
veterinary technician national examination shall request that the applicant's examination
scores be forwarded to the board. An applicant is eligible for licensure upon meeting the
licensure requirements set by the board.who:
1. Is a graduate of an approved program of veterinary technology or completed an equivalency
program of veterinary technology as established by the board by rule;
2. Passes the veterinary technician national examination;
3. Passes the state board examination;
4. Has no grounds for license refusal under section 43 - 29 - 14; and
5. Meets any additional requirements for licensure established by the board by rule.
SECTION 11. AMENDMENT. Section 43-29-07.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2129 - PAGE 9
43-29-07.2. Examination - License without examination - Temporary permitlicense.
1. The board shall hold at least two examinations a year. The board shall adopt rules governing
preparation, administration, and grading of examinations. Examinations must be designed to
test the examinee's knowledge of and proficiency in the subjects and techniques commonly
taught in veterinary schools. To pass the examination, the examinee must demonstrate
scientific and practical knowledge sufficient to prove competency to practice veterinary
medicine in the judgment of the board. An examinee must be tested by written examination,
supplemented by any oral interview and practical demonstration the board determines
necessary. The board may adopt and use the examination prepared by the national board of
veterinary medical examiners. After each examination, the board shall notify each examinee of
the result of the examination, and the board shall issue a license to each person who passed
the examination. The board shall record each new license and issue a certificate of
registration to each new licensee. Any person failing an examination may be admitted to any
subsequent examination on approval by the board and payment of the application fee.
2. The board may issue a license without a written examination to a qualified applicant who
furnishes satisfactory proof of graduation from an accredited or approved college of veterinary
medicine, or holds a certificate, and who:
a. Has for the five years immediately before filing of the application been a practicing
veterinarian licensed in a state having license requirements at the time the applicant was
first licensed which were substantially equivalent to the requirements of this chapter;
b. Has within the three years immediately before filing the application successfully
completed the examinations provided by the national board of veterinary medical
examiners; or
c. Currently holds a license to practice in at least one state, has active diplomat status in a
specialty organization recognized by the American veterinary medical association, and
whose practice is limited to the certified specialty in the state in which the specialist is
licensed without examination.
3. The board may issue without examination a temporary permitlicense to practice veterinary
medicine in this state to:
a. A qualified applicant for license pending examination, if the temporary permit expires the
day after the notice of results of the first examination given after the permit is issued. A
temporary permit may not be issued to an applicant who previously has failed the
examination in this or any other state or a foreign country.
b. A nonresident veterinarian validly licensed in another state or a foreign country who pays
the fee established and published by the board if the temporary permit is issued for a
period of no more than sixty days and no more than one permit is issued to a person
during each calendar year.
c. A senior veterinary student who practices in the office of and under the direct supervision
of a licensed veterinarian. A temporary student permit may not exceed six months from
its date of issuance and is granted without payment of a fee.
d. A graduate of a nonaccredited college of veterinary medicine, who has satisfactorily
completed the fourth year of clinical study at an accredited or approved college of
veterinary medicine, has successfully passed the examination provided by the national
board of veterinary medical examiners, and is enrolled in the educational commission for
foreign veterinary graduates program. The holder of a temporary permit issued under this
subdivision must practice under the supervision of a licensed veterinarian. A temporary
permit issued under this subdivision is valid until the holder obtains a certificate or for two
years a qualified applicant who has met the requirements established by the board.

S. B. NO. 2129 - PAGE 10
SECTION 12. AMENDMENT. Section 43-29-07.3 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
43-29-07.3. LicenseVeterinarian - License renewal - Continuing education requirements.
1. All licenses expireA veterinarian license expires annually as of July first but may be renewed
by registration with the board and payment of the registration renewal fee established by the
board. On June first of each year, the board shall mail a notice to each licensed veterinarian
that the licensee's license will expire as of July first and provide the licensee with a form for
registration. The board shall issue a new certificate of registration to a person reregistering
under this section. Any person who willfully or by neglect fails to renew a license and who
practices veterinary medicine after the expiration of the license is practicing in violation of this
chapteron June thirtieth.
2. A veterinarian license may be renewed by submission of the following to the board, no later
than June thirtieth:
a. A complete renewal application;
b. Payment of the renewal fee established by the board; and
c. Proof of completion of board required continuing education.
3. An individual who neglects or willfully fails to renew a license and practices veterinary
medicine after the expiration of the license, is practicing veterinary medicine in violation of this
chapter.
2.4. Any qualified personAn individual may renew an expired license within twofive years of the
date of its expiration by making writtencompleting an application for renewal and, paying the
current renewal fee plus all delinquent renewal fees, and completing all required continuing
education. After twofive years have elapsed since the date of expiration, a license may not be
renewed, but the holder may make applicationapply for a new license and take the license
examination. The board may by rule waive the payment of the registration renewal fee of a
licensed veterinarian during the period when the veterinarian is on active duty with any branch
of the armed services of the United States, not to exceed the longer of three years or the
duration of active duty.
3.5. The board may adopt rules establishing requirements for the continuing education of
veterinarians and veterinary technicians. The board may refuse to renew or may suspend,
revoke, or place on probationary status any license issued under this chapter upon proof the
licenseeveterinarian has failed to meet the applicable continuing education requirements.
Applicants for accreditation of continuing education courses, classes, or activities may be
charged a reasonable fee determined by the board.
SECTION 13. AMENDMENT. Section 43-29-08.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
43-29-08.1. Veterinary technician - Renewal of license - Continuing education requirements.
1. A license issued to a veterinary technician under this chapter expireslicense expires annually
on December thirty-first.
2. A veterinary technician shall submit renewal fees and current mailing address beforelicense
may be renewed by submission of the following to the board, no later than December
thirty-first on an application form provided and mailed to the licenseholder by the board:
a. A complete renewal application;
b. Payment of a renewal fee established by the board; and

S. B. NO. 2129 - PAGE 11
c. Proof of completion of board required continuing education.
3. A veterinary technician shall submit evidence of completion of required continuing education
credits in the veterinary field during the calendar year in order to apply for a license renewalAn
individual who neglects or willfully fails to renew a license and practices veterinary technology
after the expiration of the license, is practicing veterinary technology in violation of this
chapter.
4. Failure to submit the appropriateAn individual may renew an expired license renewal fee every
year results in forfeiture of all rights and privileges under this chapter and the veterinary
technician may not perform veterinary technician services unless the veterinary technician
pays a delinquency fee in addition to the licensewithin five years of the date of its expiration by
completing an application for renewal, paying the current renewal fee plus all delinquent
renewal fees, and completing all required continuing education. After five years have elapsed
since the date of expiration, a license may not be renewed, but the holder may apply for a new
license.
5. The board may refuse to renew or may suspend, revoke, or place on probationary status any
license issued under this chapter upon proof the veterinary technician has failed to meet the
applicable continuing education requirements.
SECTION 14. AMENDMENT. Section 43-29-13 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
43-29-13. Practices excepted from chapterExceptions to the practice of veterinary medicine.
1. The following personsindividuals may not be considered to be engaging in the practice of
veterinary medicine in this state:
1. a. ThoseAn individual who administer to livestocktreats animals, the title to which rests
inowned by themselves, or in theirthe individual's regular employer, except when theif
ownership of the animal was transferred or otherwise manipulated to avoid the
requirements of this chapter, or those who perform gratuitous services.
2. b. AnyoneAn individual who conducts experiments in scientific research in the development
of methods, techniques, or treatment, directly or indirectly applicable to the problems of
medicine, and who in connection with these activities uses animals.
3. c. Anyone who is a regularA student enrolled in an accredited or approved college of
veterinary medicine performing duties or actions assigned by an instructor or working
under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian during a school vacation period.
4. d. Anyone licensed in another state or nation whenAn individual engaged in this state in
consultation with veterinarians legally practicing herein.
5. e. A senior student who is in an approved school of veterinary medicine and who obtains
from the board a student permit to practice in the office and under the direct supervision
of any veterinarian practicing within this state.
6. AnyAn employee of the United States or this state while in the performance of duties as
employeesan employee.
7. f. AnyA merchant or manufacturer selling nonprescription medicine, feed, an appliance, or
any other product usedfor use as labeled in the prevention or treatment of animal
diseases.
8. g. Any veterinary technician or otherAn employee of a licensed veterinarian performing
duties under the direction andor supervision of the veterinarian responsible for the
technician's or other employee's performance, except the following duties:

S. B. NO. 2129 - PAGE 12
(1) Performing surgery;
(2) Diagnosing;
(3) Prognosing; or
(4) Prescribing.
9. h. Any member of the faculty of an accredited college of veterinary medicine performing
regular functions or a personAn individual lecturing or giving instructions or
demonstrations within the individual's area of professional expertiseat an accredited
college of veterinary medicine or in connection with a continuing education course or
seminar.
10. i. Any personAn individual selling or applying any pesticide, insecticide, or herbicide.
11. j. AnyAn individual who is not a graduate of a foreignan approved college of veterinary
medicine who, and is in the process of obtaining a certificate and is enrolled in an
equivalency program of veterinary medicine as approved by the board, performing duties
or actions assigned by the graduate's instructorsan instructor in an accreditedapproved
college of veterinary medicine.
12. k. Any personAn individual performing a direct embryo transfer procedure on a recipient
cow. Except as provided in this subsection, a personan individual performing a direct
embryo transfer procedure on a recipient cow may not administer prescription drugs to
the cow during, or as part of, the procedure. The owner of the recipient cow, however,
may administer or cause the administration of prescription drugs to the recipient cow
during, or as part of, the procedure if a veterinarian-client-patient relationship existsas
prescribed by a veterinarian.
l. An individual who administers medication or treatment as prescribed by a veterinarian.
m. An individual who performs gratuitous services for an animal in a life-threatening
situation.
2. This section may not be construed to protect individuals from animal cruelty laws in this state.
SECTION 15. A new section to chapter 43-29 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Exceptions to practice of veterinary technology.
1. The following individuals may not be considered to be engaging in the practice of veterinary
technology in this state:
a. An individual who treats an animal owned by the individual or the individual's regular
employer, except if ownership of the animal was transferred or otherwise manipulated to
avoid the requirements of this chapter.
b. An individual who conducts experiments in scientific research in the development of
methods, techniques, or treatment, directly or indirectly applicable to the problems of
medicine, and who in connection with these activities uses animals.
c. A student enrolled in an approved program of veterinary technology performing duties or
actions assigned by an instructor or working under the direct supervision of a
veterinarian.
d. An employee of the United States or this state while in the performance of duties as
employees.

S. B. NO. 2129 - PAGE 13
e. An employee of a veterinarian performing duties under the direction or supervision of the
veterinarian responsible for the employee's performance.
f. An individual lecturing or giving instructions or demonstrations within the individual's area
of professional expertise in connection with a continuing education course or seminar.
g. An individual who is not a graduate of an approved program of veterinary technology,
enrolled in an equivalency program of veterinary technology as approved by the board,
performing duties or actions assigned by an instructor in an approved program of
veterinary technology.
h. An individual who administers medication or treatment as prescribed by a veterinarian.
i. An individual who performs gratuitous services for an animal in a life-threatening
situation.
2. This section may not be construed to protect individuals from animal cruelty laws in this state.
SECTION 16. AMENDMENT. Section 43-29-14 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
43-29-14. Refusal, suspension, and revocation of license and certificate - Reinstatement and
relicense.
1. The state board of veterinary medical examiners may refuse to issue a license or certificate of
registrationtemporary license, or may suspend or revoke a license and certificate of
registrationor temporary license, upon any of the following grounds:
a. Fraud or deception in procuring the license, including conduct that violates the security or
integrity of any licensing examination.
b. The use of advertising or solicitation that is false, misleading, or otherwise determined
unprofessional under rules adopted by the board.
c. Habitual intemperance in the use of intoxicating liquors, or habitual addiction to the use
of morphine, cocaine, or other habit-forming drugsThe determination that an individual is
an impaired veterinarian as defined by section 43-29.01.1 or an impaired veterinary
technician as defined by section 43-29-01.1.
d. Immoral, unprofessional, or dishonorableUnprofessional conduct manifestly disqualifying
the licensee from practicing veterinary medicineas defined by the rules adopted by the
board, or violating the code of ethics adopted by the board by rule.
e. Incompetence, gross negligence, or other malpractice in the practice of veterinary
medicine or veterinary technology.
f. Employment of unlicensed personsindividuals to perform work that under this chapter
can lawfully be done only by personsindividuals licensed to practice veterinary medicine
or veterinary technology.
g. Fraud or dishonest conduct in applying or reporting diagnostic biological tests, inspecting
foodstuffs, or in issuing health certificatesregulatory documents.
h. Failure of the licensee to keep the premises and equipment used in the licensee's
practice in a reasonably clean and sanitary condition and failure to use reasonably
sanitary methods in the practice of veterinary medicine or veterinary technology.
i. Violation of the rules adopted by the board.

S. B. NO. 2129 - PAGE 14
j. Conviction of an offense determined by the board to have a direct bearing upon a
person'sthe ability of an individual to serve the public as a veterinarian or veterinary
technician, or when the board determines, following conviction of any offense, that a
personan individual is not sufficiently rehabilitated under section 12.1-33-02.1.
k. Willful or repeated violations of this chapter or any rule adopted by the board.
l. Failure to report, as required by law, or making false report of, any contagious or
infectious disease.
m. Cruelty to animals as defined under chapter 36-21.2.
n. Revocation of a license to practice veterinary medicine or veterinary technology by
another statejurisdiction on grounds other than nonpayment of a registrationrenewal fee.
o. The use, prescription, or dispensing of any veterinary prescription drug, or the
prescription or extra-label use of any over-the-counter drug, in the absence of a valid
veterinarian-client-patient relationship, except as provided by section 43-29-19.
2. Any personAn individual whose license has been revoked may apply to the board for
reinstatement and relicensure one year after the date of revocation. The board may reissue a
license if the board is satisfied the applicant is qualified to practice veterinary medicine or
veterinary technology, meets the existing requirements for licensure, and will comply with the
rules regarding the practice of veterinary medicine or veterinary technology.
SECTION 17. AMENDMENT. Section 43-29-15 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
43-29-15. Complaints - Investigations.
1. Any personAn individual may file a written complaint with the board setting forth the specific
charges upon which the complaint is made. Upon receiving a complaint, the board shall notify
the veterinarian or veterinary technician of the complaint and request a written response from
the veterinarian or veterinary technician. The board may adopt rules establishing a peer
review committee for the purpose of investigating complaints and providing recommendations
to the board. A veterinarian or veterinary technician who is the subject of an investigation by
the board shall cooperate fully with the investigation. Cooperation includes responding fully
and promptly to any reasonable question raised by or on behalf of the board relating to the
subject of the investigation and providing copies of records when reasonably requested by the
board. Failure to cooperate in the investigative process may be grounds for disciplinary action
against the veterinarian or veterinary technician.
2. To pursue the investigation, the board may subpoena and examine witnesses and records,
including medical records, copy, photograph, or take samples. The board may require the
veterinarian to give statements under oath, to submit to a physical or psychological
examination, or both, by a physician or other qualified evaluation professional selected by the
board if it appears to be in the best interest of the public that this evaluation be secured. After
review of the complaint, the veterinarian's response, and information obtained in the
investigation, the board shall determine if there is a reasonable basis to believe the allegations
are true and that the allegations constitute a violation of this chapter or the rules of the board.
If the board determines there is a reasonable basis to believe the allegations are true and the
allegations constitute a violation of this chapter or the rules of the board, the board shall take
appropriate action. If a reasonable basis is not found by the board, the board shall notify the
complaining party and the veterinarian in writing:
a. Subpoena and examine witnesses, records, medical records, copy, photograph, or take
samples;

S. B. NO. 2129 - PAGE 15
b. Require the veterinarian or veterinary technician to give statements under oath;
c. Require the veterinarian or veterinary technician to submit to a physical examination,
chemical dependency evaluation, or psychological examination by a physician or other
qualified evaluation professional selected by the board if there is reasonable cause to
believe the veterinarian or veterinary technician is impaired as defined by section
43 - 29 - 01.1; and
d. Require the veterinarian or veterinary technician to enroll in a treatment or monitoring
program approved by the board if the board determines in good faith enrollment would be
beneficial to the veterinarian or veterinary technician or to protect the public.
3. After review of the complaint, the response from the veterinarian or veterinary technician, and
information obtained in the investigation, the board shall determine if there is a reasonable
basis to believe the allegations are true and if the allegations constitute a violation of this
chapter or the rules of the board. If the board determines there is a reasonable basis to
believe the allegations are true and the allegations constitute a violation of this chapter or the
rules of the board, the board shall take appropriate action. If a reasonable basis is not found
by the board, the board shall notify the complaining party and the veterinarian or veterinary
technician in writing.
4. Unless the board proceeds with a disciplinary action, the complaint, the response, and any
records received by the board during an investigation of a complaint under this section are
exempt records, as defined in section 44 - 04 - 17.1 .
5. A veterinarian or veterinary technician shall report in good faith any impaired veterinarian or
impaired veterinary technician as defined by section 43 - 29 - 01.1 .
6. The board may adopt rules as necessary to carry out this section.
SECTION 18. A new section to chapter 43-29 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Self-reporting and self-referral.
1. A veterinarian or veterinary technician may voluntarily self-report or self-refer to a treatment or
monitoring program approved or contracted by the board to seek assistance for a potential or
existing impairment due to a mental health or substance use disorder.
2. A veterinarian or veterinary technician who under this section voluntarily seeks assistance
from a treatment or monitoring program in assessing or treating a potential or existing
impairment will not be reported to the board solely on the basis of self-reporting or self-
referral.
3. The identity of the veterinarian or veterinary technician and findings of the evaluation only may
be reported to the board when:
a. A veterinarian or veterinary technician refuses to undergo an evaluation by the program;
b. The evaluation reveals evidence of an impairment that could affect the ability of the
veterinarian or veterinary technician to practice, or constitutes a threat to the safety of a
patient or the public; or
c. The veterinarian or veterinary technician refuses to cooperate with a treatment plan,
monitoring and followup, or aftercare directed by the program, including a
recommendation about continuing practice.
4. Participation in the program does not protect a veterinarian or veterinary technician from
disciplinary action resulting from a complaint.

S. B. NO. 2129 - PAGE 16
5. A veterinarian or veterinary technician who self-reports or self-refers to the board for a
potential or existing impairment may be referred by the board to a treatment or monitoring
program in a manner prescribed by the board by rule, and subsequent reporting by the
program to the board is at the discretion of and in the manner prescribed by the board.
6. A veterinarian or veterinary technician who has completed a treatment or monitoring program
and is in full compliance with all parts of the treatment or monitoring plan and aftercare, may
answer in the negative to a question on an application to the board for licensure or licensure
renewal regarding current impairment by the condition for which the veterinarian or veterinary
technician completed treatment. However, any recurrence of the impairment or the existence
of other potential impairments that are not currently known to the program must be reported
on the application.
7. Notwithstanding section 44-04-18, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all records
related to participation in a treatment or monitoring program established under this section
containing identifying information about a veterinarian or veterinary technician are confidential
and only may be disclosed when:
a. Disclosure is reasonably necessary for the accomplishment of the purposes of
intervention, rehabilitation, referral assistance, or supportive services;
b. Disclosure is required by law in a legal or administrative hearing or requested by the
board for a formal disciplinary action;
c. Disclosure is necessary regarding a veterinarian's or veterinary technician's
noncompliance with the program;
d. A staff member is handling records for administrative purposes as provided under this
section; and
e. A person is participating in treatment or program monitoring, evaluations, or followup.
8. A person in attendance at any meeting of a treatment or monitoring program is not required to
testify as to the content of any findings, committee discussions, or proceedings, unless
requested by the board for a disciplinary proceeding or regarding noncompliance with the
program.
SECTION 19. A new section to chapter 43-29 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Immunity from liability.
The following individuals are immune from liability in any civil or criminal proceeding brought
against the individual for any action occurring while the individual was acting in good faith within the
scope of the individual's respective capacity:
1. A member of the board;
2. A member of a peer review committee;
3. A witness testifying in a proceeding or hearing authorized under this chapter or administrative
proceeding held under chapter 28 - 32 ;
4. A treating professional;
5. An individual who files a complaint pursuant to this Act; and
6. An individual reporting an impaired veterinarian or impaired veterinary technician as defined
by section 43-29-01.1.

S. B. NO. 2129 - PAGE 17
SECTION 20. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 43-29-16 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. In any order or decision issued by the board in which disciplinary action is imposed against a
licenseeveterinarian or veterinary technician, the board may direct the licenseeveterinarian or
veterinary technician to pay the board a sum not to exceed the reasonable and actual costs,
including attorney's fees, incurred by the board in the investigation and prosecution of the
case. When applicable, the licensee's license may be suspended until the costs are paid to
the board.
SECTION 21. AMENDMENT. Section 43-29-16.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
43-29-16.1. Abandonment of animals by ownerclient - Disposal of remains.
1. Any animal placed in the custody of a licensed doctor of veterinary medicineveterinarian for
treatment, boarding, or other care, which is abandoned by its owner or its owner's agentthe
client for a period of more than ten days after a written notice, by registered or certified letter,
return receipt requested, is givenmailed to the owner or its owner's agentclient at the
last-known address, may be turned over to the custody of the nearest humane society or dog
pound in the area or disposed of as such custodian may deem proper.
2. The givingservice of notice to the owner, or the agent of the ownerclient, of such animal by the
doctor of veterinary medicineveterinarian, as provided in subsection 1, shall relieve the doctor
of veterinary medicineveterinarian and any custodian to whom such animal may be given of
any further liability for disposal; it is further provided that such. Such procedure by the licensed
doctor of veterinary medicineveterinarian does not constitute grounds for disciplinary
procedure under this chapter.
3. For the purpose of this section, the term "abandoned" means to forsake entirely or to neglect
or refuse to provide or perform the care and support of an animal by its owner or its owner's
agentthe client; such abandonment constitutes the relinquishment of all rights and claim by the
owner of such animal.
4. Any animal remains that are left in the possession of a veterinarian and have not been
claimed by the client for a period of more than ten days after a written notice, by registered or
certified letter, return receipt requested, is mailed to the client at the last-known address, may
be disposed of by the veterinarian as deemed proper.
SECTION 22. AMENDMENT. Section 43-29-17 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
43-29-17. Unlawful practice of veterinary medicine - Penalty - Civil remedy.
Any person who
1. An individual is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if the individual:
1. a. Practices veterinary medicine, surgery, or dentistry in this state without compliance with
the provisions of this chapter;
2. b. Willfully and falsely claims or pretends to have or hold a certificate of registrationlicense
or temporary license issued by the state board of veterinary medical examiners; or
3. c. Willfully and falsely, with intent to deceive the public, claims or pretends to be a graduate
of, or to hold a degree or diploma showing the satisfactory completion of a course in
veterinary science in a school, college, or university recognizedfrom a program of
veterinary medicine approved by the board;

S. B. NO. 2129 - PAGE 18
is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
2. In addition to the criminal penalty provided, the civil remedy of injunction is available to
restrain and enjoin violations of any provisions of this chapter without proof of actual damages
sustained by any personan individual, upon application and unanimous vote of all members of
the state board of veterinary medical examiners.
SECTION 23. A new section to chapter 43-29 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Unlawful practice of veterinary technology - Penalty - Civil remedy.
1. An individual is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if the individual :
a. Practices veterinary technology in this state without compliance with the provisions of this
chapter;
b. Willfully and falsely claims or pretends to have or hold a license issued by the board; or
c. Willfully and falsely, with intent to deceive the public, claims or pretends to be a graduate
of, or to hold a degree or diploma from, a program of veterinary technology approved by
the board.
2. In addition to the criminal penalty provided, the civil remedy of injunction is available to
restrain and enjoin violations of any provisions of this chapter without proof of actual damages
sustained by an individual, upon application and unanimous vote of all members of the board.
SECTION 24. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 43-29-19 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. Other than a controlled substance, a licensed veterinarian may dispense a veterinary
prescription drug without establishing a veterinarian-client-patient relationship if:
a. The drug is prescribed by a licensed veterinarian or by a veterinarian licensed in another
jurisdictionforeign practitioner who has established a veterinarian-client-patient
relationship;
b. The prescribing veterinarian or foreign practitioner has an inadequate supply of the drug,
failure to dispense the drug would interrupt a therapeutic regimen, or failure to dispense
the drug would cause an animal to suffer; and
c. The dispensing veterinarian verifies the prescription with the prescribing veterinarian or
foreign practitioner; and
d. The dispensing veterinarian is not presumptively aware of any disciplinary action against
the prescribing veterinarian or foreign practitioner.
SECTION 25. A new section to chapter 43-29 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Veterinary telemedicine - Teleadvice and teletriage.
1. A veterinarian shall establish a veterinarian-client-patient relationship by virtue of a medically
appropriate and timely in-person examination of a patient by the veterinarian, or by a timely in-
person visit to the premises where the patient is managed or resides before the provision of
veterinary telemedicine services.
2. The provision of teleadvice or teletriage by a veterinarian does not require the prior
establishment of a veterinarian-client-patient relationship.

S. B. NO. 2129 - PAGE 19
3. A veterinary technician may perform teleadvice and teletriage without instructions from a
veterinarian.
4. The board may adopt rules as necessary to carry out this section.
SECTION 26. A new section to chapter 43-29 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Source of data.
The board shall be authorized to rely upon the expertise of and verified data gathered and stored by
no t - for-profit organizations that share in the public protection mission of the board including the
American association of veterinary state boards to make determinations under this chapter and to
promote uniformity and administrative efficiencies.
SECTION 27. A new section to chapter 43-29 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Location of the practice of veterinary medicine.
The provision of veterinary services to a patient in this state which fall within the standard of
practice of veterinary medicine regardless of the means by which the services are provided or the
physical location of the person providing those services, constitutes the practice of veterinary medicine
in this state and is subject to regulation by the board.
SECTION 28. A new section to chapter 43-29 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Indirect practice without a license for foreign practitioners.
A foreign practitioner may provide veterinary services in this state which fall within the scope of
practice designated by the foreign practitioner's license and by this chapter without obtaining a license
from the board if the services are provided through telehealth and are a continuation of an existing
veterinarian-client-patient relationship as established under this chapter.
SECTION 29. A new section to chapter 43-29 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Recognized animal services - Exceptions .
1. The provision of a recognized animal service does not constitute the practice of veterinary
medicine if provided by an individual who is not a veterinarian or veterinary technician and not
otherwise excepted from the practice of veterinary medicine under section 43 - 29 - 13 .
2. For purposes of this section, "recognized animal service" means:
a. Grooming;
b. Training or conditioning;
c. Horseshoeing or farrier work;
d. Massage therapy or acupressure;
e. Microchip implantation; and
f. An accepted livestock management practice.

S. B. NO. 2129 - PAGE 20
3. This section does not permit an individual who is not a veterinarian to diagnose, prescribe, or
perform surgical procedures, other than surgical procedures considered to be an accepted
livestock management practice.
4. The exceptions provided under this section do not extend to any other animal services.
SECTION 30. REPEAL. Sections 43-29-09, 43-29-10, 43-29-11, and 43-29-12.1 of the North
Dakota Century Code are repealed.

S. B. NO. 2129 - PAGE 21
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2129.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 4 Absent 0
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State